Connecticut, session 2026, SB00310.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the school year commencing July
1, 2026, the executive director of the Technical Education and Career
System shall establish a pilot program for the provision of one or more
courses to train students to become certified wastewater treatment
facility operators at technical education and career schools throughout
the state. Not later than January 1, 2027, the executive director shall
submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education. Such
report shall include the number of students who enrolled in such course
or courses, the timeframe in which such students may become certified
wastewater treatment facility operators after completion of such course
and recommendations for any funding or legislation to expand such
pilot program or to make such pilot program permanent.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 1 of 1